Utah statutes.
31A-6b-202.   Registration process -- Annual fee.

(1)  If a person is required to register under Section 31A-6b-201, to register the person shall submit to the commissioner:

(a)  an application for registration;

(b)  a copy of any guaranteed asset protection waiver that the person will issue, market, sell, offer to sell, or otherwise provide in this state; and

(c)  a registration fee established by the commissioner in accordance with Section 31A-3-103, except that the registration fee may not exceed $1,000.

(2) (a)  On and after July 1, 2011, a person registered under this title shall pay to the commissioner an annual fee:

(i)  by no later than July 1 of each year after the day on which the person registers; and

(ii)  established by the commissioner in accordance with Section 31A-3-103, except that the annual fee may not exceed $1,000.

(b)  If a person fails to pay the annual fee required under this Subsection (2) by October 1, the person's registration expires.

(3)  The commissioner shall deposit a fee collected under this section into the restricted account.

